Wisconsin, session 2025, SB694.
do enact as follows:SB694,11Section 1. 15.437 of the statutes is created to read:SB694,3,4115.437 Same; councils. (1) Shared revenue advisory council. (a) Not 2later than August 15 of the first year following the federal decennial census, there is 3created in the department of revenue a temporary shared revenue advisory council 4consisting of the following 8 members:SB694,3,551. One senator appointed by the senate majority leader.SB694,3,662. One senator appointed by the senate minority leader.SB694,3,873. One representative to the assembly appointed by the assembly majority 8leader.SB694,3,1094. One representative to the assembly appointed by the assembly minority 10leader.SB694,3,12115. One representative of the League of Wisconsin Municipalities, designated 12by the president thereof.SB694,3,14136. One representative of the Wisconsin Towns Association, designated by the 14president thereof.SB694,3,16157. One representative of the Wisconsin Counties Association, designated by 16the president thereof.SB694,3,18178. The secretary of revenue, or the secretary’s designee, who shall be a 18nonvoting member and serve as chairperson.SB694,3,2019(c) Each shared revenue advisory council terminates upon complying with the 20requirements under s. 79.03 (2) (e).SB694,221Section 2. 25.491 (9) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB694,4,32225.491 (9) (c) In fiscal year 2026-27, $16,257,500. In fiscal year 2027-28, and 23in each fiscal year thereafter, an amount equal to the amount credited to this 24account under this paragraph in the previous fiscal year, increased by the 1percentage change in the amount of revenues received from the taxes imposed 2under ss. 77.52 and 77.53 for the previous fiscal year from the immediately 3preceding fiscal year as determined under sub. (1), shall be credited to this account.SB694,34Section 3. 79.03 of the statutes is created to read:SB694,4,7579.03 Shared revenue advisory council. (1) In this section, “equalized 6value” means the equalized value certified by the department of revenue under s. 770.57.SB694,4,88(2) The shared revenue advisory council shall do all of the following:SB694,4,109(a) Acquire information regarding the population and equalized value of each 10county and municipality.SB694,4,1211(b) Study county and municipal revenue and expenditure variations among 12different categories of counties and municipalities based on population.SB694,4,1513(c) Review and evaluate the existing formulas for the distributions under ss. 1479.036 and 79.037 and determine the fairness of distributions among counties and 15municipalities, as reflected in each of the following:SB694,4,18161. The formula for distributions under s. 79.035, as impacted by the 17distributions under s. 79.035 effective for 2001 and by subsequent reductions in aid 18distributed under s. 79.035.SB694,4,19192. The formula for distributions under s. 79.037 effective for 2026.SB694,4,21203. Any other formula for distributions under ss. 79.036 and 79.037 established 21after the effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB inserts date].SB694,5,722(d) Make recommendations for a formula for the distributions under ss. 2379.036 and 79.037 for the next odd-numbered fiscal year, as described in s. 20.902, 1including distributions of any balance in the local government fund under s. 25.491 2and the estimated annual amounts to be credited to the local government fund 3under s. 25.491 (2) and (9) in that year. The shared revenue advisory council may 4not make a recommendation that decreases the total amount of distributions under 5ss. 79.036 and 79.037 received by any county or municipality. In making 6recommendations under this paragraph, the shared revenue advisory council shall 7do all of the following:SB694,5,981. Take account of changes in the population and equalized value of counties 9and municipalities.SB694,5,12102. Include in the formula a component for distributing aid to compensate 11counties and municipalities that experience substantial decreases in equalized 12value.SB694,5,14133. Include in the formula a component that improves the equity of 14distributions among counties and municipalities compared to each of the following:SB694,5,1715a. The formula for distributions under s. 79.035, as impacted by the 16distributions under s. 79.035 effective for 2001 and by subsequent reductions in aid 17distributed under s. 79.035.SB694,5,1818b. The formula for distributions under s. 79.037 effective for 2026.SB694,5,2019c. Any other formula for distributions under ss. 79.036 and 79.037 established 20after the effective date of this subd. 3. c. .... [LRB inserts date].SB694,5,2221(e) Not later than January 1 of the 2nd year following the federal decennial 22census, the shared revenue advisory council shall do all of the following:SB694,6,211. Submit a report containing the review and evaluation under par. (c) and the 2recommendations under par. (d) to the legislature under s. 13.172 (2).SB694,6,432. Request that the legislative reference bureau prepare legislation that gives 4effect to the recommendations under par. (d).SB694,6,653. Request that the legislative fiscal bureau prepare a fiscal analysis of the 6legislation prepared under subd. 2.SB694,6,87(3) The department of revenue shall provide the shared revenue advisory 8council with assistance in performing its duties under sub. (2).SB694,49Section 4. 79.037 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB694,6,191079.037 (3) Subject to any reduction required under sub. (4), for the 11distribution in 2025 and subsequent years, each county and municipality shall 12receive a payment under this section equal to the proportion of the total payments 13from the supplemental county and municipal aid account under s. 25.491 (9) that 14the county or municipality received in 2024, or if the total of payments received in 152024 by a county is reduced under sub. (4), the proportion of the total payments 16from the supplemental county and municipal aid account under s. 25.491 (9) that 17the county would have received in 2024 without that reduction, multiplied by the 18amount for the year in the supplemental county and municipal aid account under s. 1925.491 (9).SB694,520Section 5. 79.037 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:SB694,7,22179.037 (3m) (a) 1. Subject to any reduction required under sub. (4), for the 22distribution in 2026, each county and municipality shall receive a payment under 23this section equal to the amount received by the county or municipality under this 24section in 2025, increased by the percentage change in the amount of revenues 1received from the taxes imposed under ss. 77.52 and 77.53 for fiscal year 2025-26 2from fiscal year 2024-25 as determined under s. 25.491 (1) (c) 2.SB694,7,532. In addition to the payment under subd. 1., for the distribution in 2026, each 4municipality with a population in 2022 greater than 50,000 shall receive an amount 5calculated as follows:SB694,7,86a. Divide the population of the municipality in 2022 by the sum of the 7population in 2022 of all municipalities with a population in 2022 greater than 850,000.SB694,7,99b. Multiply the amount determined under subd. 2. a. by $16,257,500. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb694 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb694 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB694 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB694 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB694: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting